test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adj-contracted_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable adjectives belonging to FIINNIS, DEAHTIS, SMAVIS, STUORIS, NJALGGAT, CAPPIS, VIISSIS, RAHPIS, HARVVIS

Tests:
  Adj - fiinnis: # FIINNIS
    fiinnis+A+Attr: fiinna
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Gen: [fiidná, fiidnás, fiidnása]
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Ill: [fiidnái, fiidnásii]
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Com: [fiidnáin, fiidnásiinna, fiidnásiin]
    fiinnis+A+Pl+Com: [fiidnáiguin, fiidnásiiguin]
    fiinnis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [fiidnábuid, fiidnásebbuid, fiidnáseappuid, fiidnásabbuid]
    fiinnis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [fiidnát, fiidnásit]

  Adj - čoaskkis: # DEAHTIS
    čoaskkis+A+Attr: [čoaska, čoaskkes]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Gen: [čoaská, čoaskása, čoaskás]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Ill: [čoaskái, čoaskásii]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Com: [čoaskáin, čoaskásiinna, čoaskásiin]
    čoaskkis+A+Pl+Com: [čoaskáiguin, čoaskásiiguin]
    čoaskkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [čoaskábuid, čoaskásabbuid, čoaskásebbuid, čoaskáseappuid]
    čoaskkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [čoaskát, čoaskásit]
    
  Adj - smávis: # SMAVIS
    smávis+A+Attr: smávva
    smávis+A+Sg+Gen: [smávvá, smávvása, smávvás]
    smávis+A+Sg+Ill: [smávvái, smávvásii]
    smávis+A+Sg+Com: [smávváin, smávvásiin, smávvásiinna]
    smávis+A+Pl+Com: [smávváiguin, smávvásiiguin]
    smávis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [smávvábuid, smávvásabbuid, smávibuid, smávváseappuid, smávvásebbuid]
    smávis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [smávvát, smávvásit]

  Adj - stuoris: # STUORIS
    stuoris+A+Attr: [stuorra, stuora, stuorá, stuor]
    stuoris+A+Sg+Gen: stuorrá
    stuoris+A+Sg+Ill: stuorrái
    stuoris+A+Sg+Com: stuorráin
    stuoris+A+Pl+Com: stuorráiguin
    stuoris+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [stuoribuid, stuorábuid, stuorabuid]
    stuoris+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stuorrát

  Adj - čáppat: # NJALGGAT
    čáppat+A+Attr: [čáppa, čábba]
    čáppat+A+Sg+Gen: čábbá
    čáppat+A+Sg+Ill: čábbái
    čáppat+A+Sg+Com: čábbáin
    čáppat+A+Pl+Com: čábbáiguin
    čáppat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [čábbábuid, čábbásabbuid, čábbáseappuid, čábbásebbuid]
    čáppat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [čábbát, čábbásit]

  Adj - njálggis: # CAPPIS
    njálggis+A+Attr: njálgga
    njálggis+A+Sg+Gen: njálgá
    njálggis+A+Sg+Ill: njálgái
    njálggis+A+Sg+Com: njálgáin
    njálggis+A+Pl+Com: njálgáiguin
    njálggis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [njálgábuid, njálgásabbuid, njálgásebbuid, njálgáseappuid]
    njálggis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [njálgát, njálgásit]

  Adj - rikkis: # VIISSIS
    rikkis+A+Attr: [rikkes, rikkis]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Gen: [riggá, riggása, riggás]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Ill: [riggái, riggásii]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Com: [riggáin, riggásiin, riggásiinna]
    rikkis+A+Pl+Com: [riggáiguin, riggásiiguin]
    rikkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [riggábuid, riggásabbuid, riggásebbuid, riggáseappuid]
    rikkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [riggát, riggásit]

  Adj - ráhpis: # RAHPIS
    ráhpis+A+Attr: ráhpes
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Gen: [ráhppá, ráhppása, ráhppás]
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Ill: [ráhppái, ráhppásii]
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Com: [ráhppáin, ráhppásiin, ráhppásiinna]
    ráhpis+A+Pl+Com: [ráhppáiguin, ráhppásiiguin]
    ráhpis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [ráhppábuid, ráhppásabbuid, ráhppáseappuid, ráhppásebbuid]
    ráhpis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ráhppát, ráhppásit]

  Adj - hárvvis: # HARVVIS
    hárvvis+A+Attr: hárve
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Gen: [hárvá, hárvása, hárvás]
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Ill: [hárvái, hárvásii]
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Com: [hárváin, hárvásiin, hárvásiinna]
    hárvvis+A+Pl+Com: [hárváiguin, hárvásiiguin]
    hárvvis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [hárvvibuid, hárvvibuid, hárvásabbuid, hárváseappuid, hárvásebbuid]
    hárvvis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [hárvásebbuid, hárváseappuid, hárvásabbuid]
    hárvvis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [hárvásebbuid, hárváseappuid, hárvásabbuid]
    hárvvis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [hárvvit, hárvásit]
